South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S781.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Life Begins at Conception Act." SECTION 2.  Section 44-41-630 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 44-41-630. (A) An abortion provider who is to perform or induce an abortion, a certified technician, or another agent of the abortion provider who is competent in ultrasonography shall: (1) perform an obstetric ultrasound on the pregnant woman, using whichever method the physician and pregnant woman agree is best under the circumstances; (2) during the performance of the ultrasound, display the ultrasound images so that the pregnant woman may view the images; and (3) record a written medical description of the ultrasound images of the unborn child's fetal heartbeat, if present and viewable. (B) Except as provided in Section 44-41-640, Section 44-41-650, and Section 44-41-660, no person shall perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman with the specific intent of causing or abetting an abortion if the unborn child's fetal heartbeat has been detected in accordance with Section 44-41-330(A)after conception. A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be fined ten thousand dollars, imprisoned for not more than two years, or both. SECTION 3.  Section 44-41-650(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) A physician may perform, induce, or attempt to perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman after the fetal heartbeat has been detectedconception in accordance with Section 44-41-630 if: (1) the pregnancy is the result of rape, and the probable gestational age of the unborn child is not more than twelve weeks; or (2) the pregnancy is the result of incest, and the probable gestational age of the unborn child is not more than twelve weeks. SECTION 4.  The President of the Senate, on behalf of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, on behalf of the House of Representatives have an unconditional right to intervene on behalf of their respective bodies in a state court action and may provide evidence or argument, written or oral, if a party to that court action challenges the constitutionality of this act. In a federal court action that challenges the constitutionality of this act the Legislature may seek to intervene, to file an amicus brief, or to present arguments in accordance with federal rules of procedure. Intervention by the Legislature pursuant to this provision does not limit the duty of the Attorney General to appear and prosecute legal actions or defend state agencies, officers, or employees as otherwise provided. In any action in which the Legislature intervenes or participates, the Senate and the House of Representatives shall function independently from each other in the representation of their respective clients. SECTION 5. Article 6, Chapter 41, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is retitled "Life Begins at Conception." SECTION 6. If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 7.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----